Massachusetts, session 194th, H3912.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the number of
members of the board of health of the town of Marblehead shall be increased from 3 members to
5 members, with the select board annually electing a chairperson from among its members.
SECTION 2. At the first annual town election to occur following the effective date of this
act, 3 board of health members shall be elected. The candidate receiving the highest number of
votes in that election shall serve a 3-year term. The candidate receiving the second highest
number of votes shall serve a 2-year term. The candidate receiving the third highest number of
votes shall serve a 1-year term. Thereafter, as the terms of the board members expire, successors
shall be elected for terms of 3 years.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1